District of Columbia statutes.
29-1118

Selection of managers; management rights of managers.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or the governing principles:

(1)

Only the members shall select a manager or managers;

(2)

A manager may be a member or a nonmember;

(3)

If a manager is not selected, all members shall be managers;

(4)

Each manager has equal rights in the management and conduct of the association’s activities;

(5)

All matters relating to the activities shall be decided by its managers, except for matters reserved for approval by members in § 29-1112; and

(6)

A difference among managers shall be decided by a majority of the managers.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 22 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).